North Dakota, session 69, SB2142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 57-40.3-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-40.3-10. Transfer of revenue.
After the deposits under sections 57-39.2-26.1, 57-39.2-26.2, and 57-39.2-26.3, moneys
collected and received under this chapter must be deposited monthly in the state treasury and
allocated as follows:
1. Fifty percent to the general fund ; and
2. The remaining fifty percent to the flexible transportation fund under section
24 - 02 - 37.3 .
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this Act is effective for motor vehicle excise
tax collections transmitted to the state treasurer after July 31, 2025.
Page No. 1 25.0818.02000